Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Transportation of Carcasses to Rendering Plants

Cross references. —

As to transporting animals and poultry by vehicle, see ch. 21 of this title.

As to transportation of meat or poultry unlawfully obtained or killed, and as to seizure and sale of vehicles, contents, etc., see §

11-30-107

.

§ 11-23-301.
Generally; exceptions.

With the consent of the
owner, unless removal is contrary to state, county or local sanitary
regulations or in the opinion of the state veterinarian might result
in spreading contagious or infectious disease or threaten the health
of human beings, animals or poultry, carcasses of animals may be transported
to any rendering plant legally operating without prior inspection
for brands and ownership. The operator of a rendering plant within
this state receiving the carcasses is a hide buyer and shall comply
with W.S.

11-23-201

through

11-23-207

.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 139, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-443; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-301; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2001, ch. 3, § 1.

§ 11-23-302.
Transportation to another state prohibited without inspection; proof
of ownership required.

Without the consent of
the owner, or agent, it is unlawful to transport or cause to be transported
carcasses of horses, mules, cattle or sheep from Wyoming to any other
state without prior inspection for brands and marks and the issuance
of a certificate attesting the inspection by an inspector, who shall
require proof of ownership by brand record, bill of sale, or both.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 139, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-444; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 43; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-302; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2001, ch. 3, § 1.

§ 11-23-303.
Hide inspection certificate.

After receiving satisfactory
proof of ownership of carcasses of animals to be transported from
the state, the inspector shall sign and issue a hide inspection certificate
on a form approved by the board, listing the class and number of carcasses
inspected, the brands or marks on each, the name of the shipper, name
and address of the consignee, place and date of inspection, and make
and license number of the truck. If transportation is by other means
than truck, that shall be shown. Across the face of the certificate
he shall write the words “Dead Animals”. The hide inspection certificate
shall be filled out in triplicate, the original delivered to the shipper
or his agent and shall clear the carcasses for transportation to the
destination shown. One (1) copy shall be mailed by the inspector to
the board, and one (1) copy filed in the office of the brand inspection
agency.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 139, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-445; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 44; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-303; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-304.
Inspection fee; disposition thereof.

For making an inspection
of carcasses the inspector shall collect the inspection fee prescribed
by law for each horse, mule, cattle or sheep carcass. All fees collected
shall be transmitted to the board.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 139, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-446; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 45; 1976, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-304; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-23-305.
Penalty.

Violation of any provision
of W.S.

11-23-301

through

11-23-304

is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 139, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-447; W.S. 1977, § 11-26-305; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.